Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-2111
Garbage disposal; construction of section; existing facilities; zoning.

Nothing in section 19-2101 shall be construed so as to apply to or affect existing garbage disposal facilities or existing county zoning.

Laws 1961, c. 60, § 6, p. 221;

Laws 1992, LB 1257, § 66.